Utah statutes.
26-20-7.   False claims for medical benefits prohibited.

(1)  A person may not make or present or cause to be made or presented to an employee or officer of the state a claim for a medical benefit:

(a)  which is wholly or partially false, fictitious, or fraudulent;

(b)  for services which were not rendered or for items or materials which were not delivered;

(c)  which misrepresents the type, quality, or quantity of items or services rendered;

(d)  representing charges at a higher rate than those charged by the provider to the general public;

(e)  for items or services which the person or the provider knew were not medically necessary in accordance with professionally recognized standards;

(f)  which has previously been paid;

(g) for services also covered by one or more private sources when the person or provider knew of the private sources without disclosing those sources on the claim; or

(h)  where a provider:

(i)  unbundles a product, procedure, or group of procedures usually and customarily provided or performed as a single billable product or procedure into artificial components or separate procedures; and

(ii)  bills for each component of the product, procedure, or group of procedures:

(A)  as if they had been provided or performed independently and at separate times; and

(B)  the aggregate billing for the components exceeds the amount otherwise billable for the usual and customary single product or procedure.

(2)  In addition to the prohibitions in Subsection (1), a person may not:

(a)  fail to credit the state for payments received from other sources;

(b)  recover or attempt to recover payment in violation of the provider agreement from:

(i)  a recipient under a medical benefit program; or

(ii)  the recipient's family;

(c)  falsify or alter with intent to deceive, any report or document required by state or federal law, rule, or Medicaid provider agreement;

(d)  retain any unauthorized payment as a result of acts described by this section; or

(e)  aid or abet the commission of any act prohibited by this section.



Amended by Chapter 48, 2007 General Session

